vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện thiết bị điện tử > Điều khiển từ xa: Điều khiển từ xa máy lạnh; Điều khiển từ xa drone; Điều khiển từ xa hệ thống âm thanh; Điều khiển từ xa bộ phát phương tiện phát trực tuyến; Điều khiển từ xa TV; Điều khiển từ xa phổ quát
tr: Elektronik > Elektronik Alet Aksesuarları > Uzaktan Kumandalar: Klima Uzaktan Kumandaları; Drone Uzaktan Kumandaları; Ses Sistemi Uzaktan Kumandaları; Akışlı Medya Oynatıcı Uzaktan Kumandaları; TV Uzaktan Kumandaları; Evrensel Uzaktan Kumandalar
fi: Elektroniikka > Sähkötarvikkeet > Kauko-ohjaimet: Ilmastointilaitteen kaukosäätimet; Dronen kaukosäätimet; Äänijärjestelmän kaukosäätimet; Suoratoistomedialaitteen kaukosäätimet; TV-kaukosäätimet; Universaalikaukosäätimet
nb: Elektronikk > Elektronikktilbehør > Fjernkontroller: Aircondition-fjernkontroller; Drone-fjernkontroller; Lydsystem-fjernkontroller; Strømmemediespiller-fjernkontroller; TV-fjernkontroller; Universalfjernkontroller
ja: 電子機器 > 電気製品関連用品・PC周辺機器 > リモコン: エアコンリモコン; ドローンリモコン; オーディオシステムリモコン; ストリーミングメディアプレーヤーリモコン; テレビリモコン; 汎用リモコン
hu: Elektronika > Elektronikai kiegészítők > Távirányítók: Légkondicionáló távirányítók; Dróntávirányítók; Hangrendszer-távirányítók; Streaming médialejátszó-távirányítók; TV-távirányítók; Univerzális távirányítók
sv: Elektronik > Elektroniktillbehör > Fjärrkontroller: Fjärrkontroller för luftkonditionering; Fjärrkontroller för drönare; Fjärrkontroller för ljudsystem; Fjärrkontroller för streamingspelare; TV-fjärrkontroller; Universalfjärrkontroller
hr-HR: Elektronika > Pribor za elektroniku > Daljinski upravljači: Daljinski upravljači za klima uređaje; Daljinski upravljači za dronove; Daljinski upravljači za zvučne sustave; Daljinski upravljači za streamanje medija; Daljinski upravljači za televizore; Univerzalni daljinski upravljači
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Acessórios eletrónicos > Controlos remotos: Comandos para ar condicionado; Comandos para drone; Comandos para sistema de som; Comandos para leitor de streaming; Comandos para TV; Comandos universais
da: Elektronik > Elektronik – tilbehør > Fjernbetjeninger: Aircondition – fjernbetjeninger; Drone – fjernbetjeninger; Lydsystem – fjernbetjeninger; Fjernbetjeninger til streaming-medieafspillere; TV-fjernbetjeninger; Universelle fjernbetjeninger
sk-SK: Elektronika > Elektronické príslušenstvo > Diaľkové ovládače: Diaľkové ovládače klimatizácií; Diaľkové ovládače dronov; Diaľkové ovládače zvukových systémov; Diaľkové ovládače streamovacích prehrávačov; Diaľkové ovládače televízorov; Univerzálne diaľkové ovládače
lt-LT: Elektronika > Elektronikos priedai > Nuotolinio valdymo pultai: Oro kondicionierių valdymo pultai; Dronų valdymo pultai; Garso sistemų valdymo pultai; Srautinių medijos grotuvų valdymo pultai; Televizorių valdymo pultai; Universalūs valdymo pultai
pl: Elektronika > Akcesoria elektroniczne > Piloty: Piloty klimatyzacji; Piloty drona; Piloty systemu audio; Piloty odtwarzaczy mediów strumieniowych; Piloty telewizora; Uniwersalne piloty
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρονικών συσκευών > Τηλεχειριστήρια: Τηλεχειριστήρια κλιματιστικού; Τηλεχειριστήρια drone; Τηλεχειριστήρια συστήματος ήχου; Τηλεχειριστήρια συσκευής streaming; Τηλεχειριστήρια τηλεόρασης; Τηλεχειριστήρια καθολικής χρήσης
cs: Elektronika > Elektronika – příslušenství > Dálková ovládání: Dálkové ovladače klimatizací; Dálkové ovladače dronů; Dálkové ovladače zvukových systémů; Dálkové ovladače streamovacích přehrávačů; Dálkové ovladače televizorů; Univerzální dálkové ovladače
ko: 전자기기 > 전자기기 부대용품 > 리모컨: 에어컨 리모컨; 드론 리모컨; 사운드 시스템 리모컨; 스트리밍 미디어 플레이어 리모컨; TV 리모컨; 범용 리모컨
it: Elettronica > Accessori dispositivi elettronici > Telecomandi: Telecomandi del condizionatore d'aria; Telecomandi per droni; Telecomandi dell'impianto audio; Telecomandi per lettore multimediale in streaming; Telecomandi TV; Telecomandi universali
de: Elektronik > Elektronisches Zubehör > Fernbedienungen: Klimaanlagen-Fernbedienungen; Drohnen-Fernbedienungen; Soundsystem-Fernbedienungen; Streaming-Media-Player-Fernbedienungen; TV-Fernbedienungen; Universal-Fernbedienungen
sl-SI: Elektronika > Elektronski dodatki > Daljinski upravljalniki: Daljinski upravljalniki za klime; Daljinski upravljalniki za drone; Daljinski upravljalniki za zvočne sisteme; Daljinski upravljalniki za predvajalnike pretočnih medijev; Daljinski upravljalniki za televizorje; Univerzalni daljinski upravljalniki
nl: Elektronica > Accessoires voor elektronica > Afstandsbedieningen: Airconditioning afstandsbedieningen; Drone afstandsbedieningen; Geluidssysteem afstandsbedieningen; Streaming mediaspeler afstandsbedieningen; TV afstandsbedieningen; Universele afstandsbedieningen
bg-BG: Електроника > Аксесоари за електроника > Дистанционни управления: Дистанционни управления за климатик; Дистанционни управления за дрон; Дистанционни управления за аудио система; Дистанционни управления за стрийминг медия плейър; Дистанционни управления за телевизор; Универсални дистанционни управления
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子配件 > 遥控器: 空调遥控器; 无人机遥控器; 音响系统遥控器; 流媒体播放器遥控器; 电视遥控器; 万能遥控器
ro-RO: Electronice > Accesorii electronice > Telecomenzi: Telecomenzi pentru aparate de aer condiționat; Telecomenzi pentru drone; Telecomenzi pentru sisteme audio; Telecomenzi pentru playere media de streaming; Telecomenzi pentru televizoare; Telecomenzi universale
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Acessórios para eletrônicos > Controles remotos: Controles remotos para ar condicionado; Controles remotos para drone; Controles remotos para sistema de som; Controles remotos para streaming media player; Controles remotos para TV; Controles remotos universais
ru: Электроника > Аксессуары для электроники > Пульты дистанционного управления: Пульты управления для кондиционеров; Пульты управления для дронов; Пульты управления для звуковых систем; Пульты управления для медиаплееров; Пульты управления для телевизоров; Универсальные пульты управления
fr: Appareil électronique > Accessoires électroniques > Télécommandes: Télécommandes pour climatiseur; Télécommandes pour drone; Télécommandes pour système audio; Télécommandes pour lecteur multimédia en continu; Télécommandes pour télévision; Télécommandes universelles
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > รีโมตคอนโทรล: รีโมตคอนโทรลเครื่องปรับอากาศ; รีโมตคอนโทรลโดรน; รีโมตคอนโทรลระบบเสียง; รีโมตคอนโทรลเครื่องเล่นสตรีมมิง; รีโมตคอนโทรลทีวี; รีโมตคอนโทรลอเนกประสงค์
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電子配件 > 遙控器: 冷氣遙控器; 無人機遙控器; 音響系統遙控器; 串流媒體播放器遙控器; 電視遙控器; 萬用遙控器
en: Electronics > Electronics Accessories > Remote Controls: Air Conditioner Remote Controls; Drone Remote Controls; Sound System Remote Controls; Streaming Media Player Remote Controls; TV Remote Controls; Universal Remote Controls
es: Electrónica > Accesorios electrónicos > Mandos a distancia: Controles remotos de aire acondicionado; Controles remotos de dron; Controles remotos de sistema de sonido; Controles remotos de reproductor de medios de streaming; Controles remotos de TV; Controles remotos universales